Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2505
Use of term; restriction.

(1) The use of the term "Nebraska Plane Coordinate System" on any map, report, survey, or other document shall be limited to coordinates based upon the Nebraska Plane Coordinate System.

(2) The provisions of the Nebraska Plane Coordinate System Act shall not be construed to prohibit the appropriate use of other geodetic reference networks.

Laws 1998, LB 924, § 67;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1605;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 501;

Laws 2024, LB102, § 14.